incubator/apertium-liv-fin/apertium-liv-fin.liv.lexc
LEXICON V-AUX_KĪTÕ
!! kītõ:kīt 53
%<v%>%<aux%>: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON IV_KĪTÕ
!! kītõ:kīt 53
!! ~701
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_KĪTÕ
!! kītõ:kīt 53
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-01_KŪLÕ ;


LEXICON IV_ÄʼBȚÕ
!! äʼbțõ:äʼbț 54
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_ÄʼBȚÕ
!! äʼbțõ:äʼbț 54
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON V_KŪLDÕ
!! kūldõ:kūld 55
%<v%>%<v%>: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON V-AUX_KŪLDÕ
!! kūldõ:kūld 55
%<v%>%<aux%>: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON IV_KŪLDÕ
!! kūldõ:kūld 55
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_KŪLDÕ
!! kūldõ:kūld 55
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_KĪSKÕ
!! kīskõ:kīsk 56
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON V-AUX_ĪʼEDÕ
!! īʼedõ:īed 57
%<v%>%<aux%>: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON IV_ĪʼEDÕ
!! īʼedõ:īed 57
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_ĪʼEDÕ
!! īʼedõ:īed 57
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON V_UMBLÕ
!! umblõ:umblõ 58
%<v%>: V-01_UMBLÕ ;

LEXICON IV_UMBLÕ
!! umblõ: 58
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-01_UMBLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_UMBLÕ
!! umblõ: 58
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-01_UMBLÕ ;

LEXICON V-AUX_MÕTLÕ
!! mõtlõ: 59
%<v%>%<aux%>: V-01_UMBLÕ ;

LEXICON IV_MÕTLÕ
!! mõtlõ: 59
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-01_UMBLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_MÕTLÕ
!! mõtlõ: 59
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-01_UMBLÕ ;

LEXICON IV_MǞʼDLÕ
!! mǟʼdlõ: 60
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-01_UMBLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_MǞʼDLÕ
!! mǟʼdlõ: 60
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-01_UMBLÕ ;

LEXICON IV_NAʼGRÕ
!! naʼgrõ: 60
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-01_UMBLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_NAʼGRÕ
!! naʼgrõ: 60
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-01_UMBLÕ ;

LEXICON V-AUX_ALĀ
!! 62 alā:alā
%<v%>%<aux%>: K ;

LEXICON V-AUX_ÄʼB
!! 62 äʼb:ä
%<v%>%<neg%>: K ;

LEXICON V-AUX_IʼZ
!! 62 iʼz:ä
%<v%>%<neg%>: K ;

LEXICON TV_SÄ
!! 63 sä:sä
%<v%>%<tv%>: K ;

LEXICON V-AUX_PIḐĪKS
!! 64 piḑīks:piḑī
%<v%>%<aux%>: K ;

!! !!After transitive, intransitive, auxiliary and such tags have been added
!! 1

!! 2
LEXICON V-01_TǬʼDÕ
 V-01_VĪDÕ ;

!! 3
LEXICON V-01_VĪDÕ
!! This is mutual for 3: 
!! vīdõ:vī
:d   GER_sõ   ;
   INF_dõ	  ;
   SUP-STEM_mõ	  ; 
   INDPRSSG1-STEM    ;
   INDCONNEGSG    ;
!! Prt
 INDPRT_ž    ;
! Cond
: CONDPRS ;
!! Imprt
	IMPRTPRSSG2    ;
	IMPRTPRSPL1	;
	IMPRTPRSPL2	;
	IMPRTPRSCONNEG ;

!! Jus
 JUSPRS_gõ	;
!! Qvo
 QUOPRS-STEM_ji	;

!! participles
 ACTPRSPRC ;
 ACTPRFPRC_nd ;
:%^VowsRM PSSPRSPRC ;
:%^VowsRM	PSSPRFPRCSG    ;
!! 4

!! 9
LEXICON V-01_JŪODÕ
!! jūodõ:vī
:d   GER_sõ   ;
   INF_dõ	  ;
   SUP-STEM_mõ	  ; 
   INDPRSSG1-STEM    ;
   INDCONNEGSG    ;
!! Prt
 INDPRT_i    ;
! Cond
: CONDPRS ;
!! Imprt
	IMPRTPRSSG2    ;
	IMPRTPRSPL1	;
	IMPRTPRSPL2	;
	IMPRTPRSCONNEG ;

!! Jus
 JUSPRS_gõ	;
!! Qvo
 QUOPRS-STEM_ji	;

!! participles
 ACTPRSPRC ;
 ACTPRFPRC_nd ;
 PSSPRSPRC ;
 PSSPRFPRCSG    ;
!! 10

!!
LEXICON V-01_JEʼLLÕ
!! 13 jeʼllõ, 18 astõ, 19 võttõ, 24 vieʼddõ, 25 maksõ, 26 tappõ
:%^Stress2to1 GER_s     ;
:%^Stress2to1 INF_ZERO      ;
:%^Stress2to1 SUP-STEM_m        ;
:%^StodRM%^ConsSh%^VowsRM%>ā   INDPRSSG1-STEM    ;
:%^ConsSh   INDCONNEGSG    ;
:%^StodRM%^ConsSh%^VowsRM%>ī INDPRT_z ;
!%<ind%>%<sg%>%<conneg%>:	K    ;

!%<cond%>%<sg3%>:õks	K    ;
 CONDPRS ;

!%<imprt%>%<sg2%>:  	K    ;
!%<imprt%>%<conneg%>:	K    ;
!%<imprt%>%<pl2%>:õgid	K    ;
!%<jus%>%<sg3%>:õg		K    ;
!%<quo%>%<sg%>:iji		K    ;
!%<act%>%<prfprc%>%<sg%>:õn	K    ;
:%^Stress2to1%^VowsRM%^ConsRM	PSSPRFPRCSG    ;
!!
LEXICON V-01_MÄNGÕ
!! 14 mängõ, 15 killõ, 16 pallõ, 17 loulõ, 20 laitõ, 21 täutõ, 22 pȯļtõ, 23 mȯistõ, 27 āndõ, 28 tīeudõ
 GER_s     ;
:%^Stress2to1 INF_ZERO      ;
:%^Stress2to1 SUP-STEM_m        ;
:   INDPRSSG1-STEM    ;
:%^ConsSh   INDCONNEGSG    ;
:%^VowsRM%>ī INDPRT_z ;
!%<ind%>%<sg%>%<conneg%>:	K    ;

!%<cond%>%<sg3%>:õks	K    ;
 CONDPRS ;

!%<imprt%>%<sg2%>:  	K    ;
!%<imprt%>%<conneg%>:	K    ;
!%<imprt%>%<pl2%>:õgid	K    ;
!%<jus%>%<sg3%>:õg		K    ;
!%<quo%>%<sg%>:iji		K    ;
!%<act%>%<prfprc%>%<sg%>:õn	K    ;
:%^Stress2to1%^VowsRM%^ConsRM	PSSPRFPRCSG    ;

!!
!! 29
LEXICON	V-01_LUʼGGÕ
!! This is mutual for 29-36: 
!! luggõ, mudžõ, vakțõ, kittõ, riddõ, kutsõ, laskõ, akkõ
 GER_s   ;
 INF_ZERO	  ;
 SUP-STEM_m	  ; 
:%^StodRM%^ConsSh%^VowsRM%>ū INDPRSSG1-STEM    ;
:%^ConsSh%^VowsRM INDCONNEGSG    ;
!! Prt
:%^StodRM%^ConsSh%^VowsRM%>ī INDPRT_z    ;
! Cond
:%^StodRM%^ConsSh%^VowsRM%>ū CONDPRS ;
!! Imprt
:%^ConsSh%^VowsRM	IMPRTPRSSG2    ;
:%^Stress2to1 IMPRTPRSPL1	;
:%^Stress2to1 IMPRTPRSPL2	;
:%^Stress2to1 IMPRTPRSCONNEG ;

%<v%>%<imprt%>%<prs%>%<pl2%>:%^Stress2to1%>gid	K    ;
!! Jus
 JUSPRS_g	;
!! Kvo
:%^VowsRM QUOPRS-STEM_iji	;

!! participles
 ACTPRSPRC ;
 ACTPRFPRC_n ;
:%^ConsSh%^VowsRM PSSPRSPRC ;
:%^ConsSh%^VowsRM	PSSPRFPRCSG    ;

!!

LEXICON V-01_AIGÕ
!! This is mutual for 37-48
:%^Stress1to2 GER_s   ;
:%^Stress1to2 INF_ZERO	  ;
:%^Stress1to2 SUP-STEM_m	  ; 
 INDPRSSG1-STEM    ;
:%^Stress1to2%^VowsRM	INDCONNEGSG    ;
!! Prt
:%^VowsRM%>i INDPRT_z    ;

!! participles
:%^Stress1to2 ACTPRSPRC ;
:%^Stress1to2 ACTPRFPRC_n ;
:%^Stress1to2%^VowsRM%^ConsRM PSSPRSPRC ;
:%^Stress1to2%^VowsRM%^ConsRM	PSSPRFPRCSG    ;

:%^Stress1to2 CONDPRS ;
:%^Stress1to2%^VowsRM IMPRTPRSSG2 ;
:%^Stress1to2 IMPRTPRSPL1 ;
:%^Stress1to2 IMPRTPRSPL2 ;
 IMPRTPRSCONNEG ;
:%^Stress1to2 JUSPRS_g	;
:%^Stress1to2%^VowsRM QUOPRS-STEM_iji	;		

!!
LEXICON V-01_KŪLÕ
! This is mutual for 49-57
 GER_s   ;
 INF_ZERO	  ;
 SUP-STEM_m	  ; 
: INDPRSSG1-STEM    ;
:%^ConsSh	INDCONNEGSG    ;
!! Prt
:%^VowsRM%>i INDPRT_z    ;


!!
!! 58, 
LEXICON V-01_UMBLÕ
!! This is mutual for 58-61: 
!! umblõ, mõtlõ, mǟʼdlõ, naʼgrõ
   GER_s   ;
   INF_ZERO	  ;
   SUP-STEM_m	  ; 
   INDPRSSG1-STEM    ;
   INDCONNEGSG    ;
!! Prt
:%^VowsRM%>i INDPRT_z    ;
! Cond
: CONDPRS ;
!! Imprt
:%^VowsMetath%^VowsRM	IMPRTPRSSG2    ;
: IMPRTPRSPL1	;
: IMPRTPRSPL2	;
:%^VowsMetath%^VowsRM IMPRTPRSCONNEG ;

!! Jus
 JUSPRS_g	;
!! Qvo
:%^VowsRM QUOPRS-STEM_iji	;

!! participles
 ACTPRSPRC ;
 ACTPRFPRC_n ;
:%^VowsRM PSSPRSPRC ;
:%^VowsRM	PSSPRFPRCSG    ;




LEXICON VTag
	Persons	;

LEXICON Persons
%<v%>%<1sg%>:en   #   ;
%<v%>%<2sg%>:et   #   ;
%<v%>%<3sg%>:e    #   ;
%<v%>%<1pl%>:ien  #   ;
%<v%>%<2pl%>:iet  #   ;
%<v%>%<3pl%>:iet  #   ;
%<v%>%<inf%>:0    #   ;
!#:0   Nouns   ;

!! Nonfinites
LEXICON GER_s
%<ger%>%<ine%>:%>s   K ;

LEXICON GER_sõ
%<ger%>%<ine%>:%>sõ   K ;

LEXICON INF_ZERO
%<inf%>:	K	;

LEXICON INF_dõ
%<inf%>:%>dõ    K   ;

LEXICON INF_da
%<inf%>:%>da    K   ;

LEXICON SUP-STEM_m
   SUP_m	;
   INDPRSPL1    ;
   INDPRSPL2    ;
   INDPRSPL3    ;
   INDCONNEGPL1	;
   INDCONNEGPL2	;
   INDCONNEGPL3	;

LEXICON SUP_m
%<sup%>%<abe%>:%>mõt K   ;
%<sup%>%<ela%>:%>mõst K   ;
%<sup%>%<deb%>:%>mõst K   ;
%<sup%>%<ill%>:%>m K   ;
%<sup%>%<ine%>:%>mõs K   ;
%<sup%>%<tra%>:%>mõks K   ;

LEXICON	SUP-STEM_mõ
   SUP_mõ	;
   INDPRSPL1    ;
   INDPRSPL2    ;
   INDPRSPL3    ;
   INDCONNEGPL1 ;
   INDCONNEGPL2 ;
   INDCONNEGPL3 ;

LEXICON SUP_mõ
%<sup%>%<abe%>:%>mõt K   ;
%<sup%>%<ela%>:%>mõst K   ;
%<sup%>%<deb%>:%>mõst K   ;
%<sup%>%<ill%>:%>mõ K   ;
%<sup%>%<ine%>:%>mõs K   ;
%<sup%>%<tra%>:%>mõks K   ;

LEXICON ACTPRSPRC
%<act%>%<prsprc%>%<sg%>:%>b	K    ;
%<act%>%<prsprc%>%<pl%>:%>bõd	K    ;
%<act%>%<prsprc%>%<der_a%>:%>b	A_SIDĀM    ;

LEXICON	ACTPRFPRC_n
%<act%>%<prfprc%>%<sg%>:%>n	K    ;
%<act%>%<prfprc%>%<pl%>:%>nd	K    ;

LEXICON ACTPRFPRC_nd
%<act%>%<prfprc%>%<sg%>:%>nd      K    ;
%<act%>%<prfprc%>%<pl%>:%>nd     K    ; !! Are the singular and plural homonyms?



LEXICON PSSPRSPRC
%<pss%>%<prsprc%>%<sg%>:%>dõb        K    ;
%<pss%>%<prsprc%>%<pl%>:%>dõbõd      K    ;

LEXICON PSSPRFPRCSG
%<pss%>%<prfprc%>%<sg%>:%>dõd    K    ;

!! Finites

LEXICON INDPRS
!! Indicative present
  INDPRSSG1-STEM	;
  INDPRSPL1	;
  INDPRSPL2	;
  INDPRSPL3	;

LEXICON INDPRS_tõ
!! Indicative present
  INDPRSSG1-STEM	;
  INDPRSPL1	;
  INDPRSPL2_tõ	;
  INDPRSPL3	;

LEXICON INDPRT_i
!! Indicative preterite in i
 INDPRTSG1_i    ;
 INDPRTSG2_i    ;
 INDPRTSG3_i    ;
 INDPRTPL1_i    ;
 INDPRTPL2_i    ;
 INDPRTPL3_i    ;

LEXICON INDPRT_z
!! Indicative preterite in z
 INDPRTSG1_z    ;
 INDPRTSG2_z    ;
 INDPRTSG3_z    ;
 INDPRTPL1_z    ;
 INDPRTPL2_z    ;
 INDPRTPL3_z    ;

LEXICON INDPRT_ž
!! Indicative preterite in ž
 INDPRTSG1_ž    ;
 INDPRTSG2_ž    ;
 INDPRTSG3_ž    ;
 INDPRTPL1_ž    ;
 INDPRTPL2_ž    ;
 INDPRTPL3_ž    ;

LEXICON verbs
algõ:algõ V-AUX_ÄʼB   ; !"älköön"
alā:alā V-AUX_ÄʼB   ; !"älä"
broʼutšõ:broʼutšõ IV_ĪʼEDÕ   ; !"ajaa"
dutskõ:dutskõ TV_KŪLDÕ   ; !"töniä"
glagāstõ:glagāstõ IV_KĪTÕ   ; !"metelöidä"
goŗīkšõ:goŗīkšõ IV_KŪLDÕ   ; !"kurista"
irtlõ:irtlõ TV_UMBLÕ   ; !"valmentaa"
iʼgtõ:iʼgtõ IV_ÄʼBȚÕ   ; !"hikoilla"
iʼz:iʼz V-AUX_ÄʼB   ; !"en"
iʼzt:iʼzt V-AUX_ÄʼB   ; !"et"
jarātuņšlõ:jarā#tuņšlõ TV_UMBLÕ   ; !"todeta"
jaʼgtõ:jaʼgtõ TV_ÄʼBȚÕ   ; !"jaottaa"
jutlõ:jutlõ TV_MÕTLÕ   ; !"saarnata"
jūlgastõ:jūlgastõ TV_KĪTÕ   ; !"rohkaista"
jǭʼdõ:jǭʼdõ IV_ĪʼEDÕ   ; !"jäähtyä"
karglõ:karglõ IV_UMBLÕ   ; !"hyppiä"
katkāndõ:katkāndõ IV_KĪTÕ   ; !"katketa"
kiʼzlõ:kiʼzlõ TV_NAʼGRÕ   ; !"kysellä"
kläʼbbõrtõ:kläʼbbõrtõ IV_ÄʼBȚÕ   ; !"ryskää"
kreitsõ:kreitsõ IV_KŪLDÕ   ; !"luovia"
krǭpšõ:krǭpšõ TV_KŪLDÕ   ; !"raapia"
krǭʼpõ:krǭʼpõ TV_ĪʼEDÕ   ; !"pettää"
kīerlõ:kīerlõ IV_UMBLÕ   ; !"kieriskellä"
kīskõ:kīskõ TV_KĪSKÕ   ; !"kiskoa"
kūldatõ:kūldatõ TV_KĪTÕ   ; !"kullata"
kūʼoḑštõ:kūʼoḑštõ IV_ÄʼBȚÕ   ; !"käydä oikeutta"
kǟʼtõ:kǟʼtõ TV_ÄʼBȚÕ   ; !"kävelyttää"
kǭʼdlõ:kǭʼdlõ IV_MǞʼDLÕ   ; !"epäillä"
ladūtõ:ladūtõ IV_KĪTÕ   ; !"livistää"
laʼiglõ:laʼiglõ IV_MǞʼDLÕ   ; !"levitä"
leʼžgõldõ:leʼžgõldõ IV_ÄʼBȚÕ   ; !"lähestyä"
läḑīkšõ:läḑīkšõ TV_KŪLDÕ   ; !"mumista"
lūʼotšõ:lūʼotšõ TV_ĪʼEDÕ   ; !"taivuttaa"
maršõ:maršõ IV_KŪLDÕ   ; !"marssia"
maʼikslõ:maʼikslõ IV_MǞʼDLÕ   ; !"XX"
muʼidlõ:muʼidlõ IV_MǞʼDLÕ   ; !"hymyillä"
muʼldõ:muʼldõ IV_ĪʼEDÕ   ; !"lörpötellä"
mõtlõ:mõtlõ TV_MÕTLÕ   ; !"ajatella"
mõtlõ:mõtlõ V-AUX_MÕTLÕ   ; !"aikoa"
mõʼŗžtõ:mõʼŗžtõ TV_ÄʼBȚÕ   ; !"rytistää"
mēʼrdõ:mēʼrdõ TV_ĪʼEDÕ   ; !"pitää nälässä"
mīmtõ:mīmtõ TV_KĪTÕ   ; !""
mǟrgandõ:mǟrgandõ IV_KĪTÕ   ; !"mädätä"
mǟʼdlõ:mǟʼdlõ TV_MǞʼDLÕ   ; !"muistaa"
naʼgrõ:naʼgrõ TV_NAʼGRÕ   ; !"nauraa"
nopkõ:nopkõ TV_KŪLDÕ   ; !"poimia"
nõʼgļõ:nõʼgļõ TV_NAʼGRÕ   ; !"parsia"
nõʼvtõ:nõʼvtõ IV_ÄʼBȚÕ   ; !"neuvotella"
nīsklõ:nīsklõ IV_UMBLÕ   ; !"huohottaa"
nīskõ:nīskõ TV_KĪSKÕ   ; !"niistää"
nūškõ:nūškõ TV_KĪSKÕ   ; !"XX"
oʼvstõ:oʼvstõ TV_ÄʼBȚÕ   ; !"XX"
piḑīks:piḑī V-AUX_PIḐĪKS   ; !"XX"
piḑīm:piḑīm V-AUX_PIḐĪKS   ; !"XX"
prīʼetsõ:prīʼetsõ IV_ĪʼEDÕ   ; !"XX"
puiklõ:puiklõ IV_UMBLÕ   ; !"XX"
punktīertõ:punktīertõ TV_KĪTÕ   ; !"XX"
puslõ:puslõ IV_MÕTLÕ   ; !"XX"
pļärīkšõ:pļärīkšõ IV_KŪLDÕ   ; !"XX"
pļärīkšõ:pļärīkšõ V_KŪLDÕ   ; !"XX"
pūšlõ:pūšlõ V_UMBLÕ   ; !"XX"
pǟgiņḑõ:pǟgiņḑõ IV_KĪTÕ   ; !"XX"
raʼdļõ:raʼdļõ TV_NAʼGRÕ   ; !"XX"
raʼdļõ:raʼdļõ IV_NAʼGRÕ   ; !"XX"
reslõ:reslõ IV_MÕTLÕ   ; !"XX"
riņțlõ:riņțlõ IV_UMBLÕ   ; !"XX"
rõkāndõ:rõkāndõ V-AUX_KĪTÕ   ; !"XX"
rǭstõ:rǭstõ V-AUX_KĪTÕ   ; !"XX"
sipšlõ:sipšlõ TV_UMBLÕ   ; !"XX"
sizāltõ:sizāltõ TV_KĪTÕ   ; !"XX"
soʼvdõ:soʼvdõ IV_ĪʼEDÕ   ; !"XX"
soʼvtõ:soʼvtõ TV_ÄʼBȚÕ   ; !"XX"
spõrkšlõ:spõrkšlõ IV_UMBLÕ   ; !"XX"
strǭdõ:strǭdõ TV_KŪLDÕ   ; !"XX"
suoḑīkšõ:suoḑīkšõ IV_KŪLDÕ   ; !"XX"
sä:sä TV_SÄ   ; !"XX"
sägīd:sägīd TV_SÄ   ; !"XX"
sõʼgļõ:sõʼgļõ TV_NAʼGRÕ   ; !"XX"
sõʼņšlõ:sõʼņšlõ TV_MǞʼDLÕ   ; !"XX"
sõʼņšlõ:sõʼņšlõ TV_MǞʼDLÕ   ; !"XX"
sūʼoḑõ:sūʼoḑõ TV_ĪʼEDÕ   ; !"XX"
sǟdlõ:sǟdlõ TV_UMBLÕ   ; !"XX"
taplõ:taplõ IV_MÕTLÕ   ; !"XX"
tiʼrpõ:tiʼrpõ IV_ĪʼEDÕ   ; !"XX"
tärkšlõ:tärkšlõ TV_UMBLÕ   ; !"XX"
tīkõ:tīkõ V-AUX_KŪLDÕ   ; !"XX"
tīʼedslõ:tīʼedslõ TV_MǞʼDLÕ   ; !"XX"
tšabīņțõ:tšabīņțõ IV_KĪTÕ   ; !"XX"
tšokārtõ:tšokārtõ TV_KĪTÕ   ; !"XX"
tšäbīkšõ:tšäbīkšõ IV_KŪLDÕ   ; !"XX"
tūldõ:tūldõ TV_KŪLDÕ   ; !"XX"
tūʼoḑõ:tūʼoḑõ V-AUX_ĪʼEDÕ   ; !"XX"
tūʼoḑõ:tūʼoḑõ V-AUX_ĪʼEDÕ   ; !"XX"
tǟʼntõ:tǟʼntõ IV_ÄʼBȚÕ   ; !"XX"
ulzmõtlõ:ulz#mõtlõ TV_MÕTLÕ   ; !"XX"
umblõ:umblõ TV_UMBLÕ   ; !"XX"
uʼrbõ:uʼrbõ TV_ĪʼEDÕ   ; !"XX"
uʼņštõ:uʼņštõ TV_ÄʼBȚÕ   ; !"XX"
vaʼidlõ:vaʼidlõ IV_MǞʼDLÕ   ; !"XX"
vǟʼgrõ:vǟʼgrõ IV_MǞʼDLÕ   ; !"XX"
vǭŗštõ:vǭŗštõ TV_KĪTÕ   ; !"XX"
vȯʼdlõ:vȯʼdlõ TV_NAʼGRÕ   ; !"odottaa"
ämārdõ:ämārdõ IV_KĪTÕ   ; !"hämärtyä"
ät:ät V-AUX_ÄʼB   ; !"ette"
äʼb:äʼb V-AUX_ÄʼB   ; !"en"
ēʼḑõ:ēʼḑõ TV_ĪʼEDÕ   ; !"pukeutua"
ēʼḑtõ:ēʼḑtõ TV_ÄʼBȚÕ   ; !"XX"
īʼtlõ:īʼtlõ TV_MǞʼDLÕ   ; !"verrata"
īʼtlõ:īʼtlõ TV_MǞʼDLÕ   ; !"XX"
ūoļikšõ:ūoļikšõ TV_KŪLDÕ   ; !"XX"
ūʼdõ:ūʼdõ TV_ĪʼEDÕ   ; !"XX"
ǭʼmiļtõ:ǭʼmiļtõ IV_ÄʼBȚÕ   ; !"XX"
ȭrikšõ:ȭrikšõ IV_KŪLDÕ   ; !"XX"
